Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2803
Property; unpaid taxes; sale; date.

The county treasurer shall set a date of sale which shall be within two months of the date of the certification made pursuant to section 77-2802 and proceed, as provided in sections 77-2801 to 77-2809, to offer and sell such property to the highest bidder.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 3, p. 1495.